Washington statutes.
RCW 35.88.080

Inland cities over one hundred thousand—Discharge of sewage and other discharges prohibited—Nuisance.

Any city not located on tidewater, having a population of one hundred thousand or more, is hereby prohibited from discharging, draining or depositing, or causing to be discharged, drained or deposited, any sewage, garbage, feculent matter, offal, refuse, filth, or any animal, mineral, or vegetable matter or substance, offensive, injurious or dangerous to health, into any springs, streams, rivers, lakes, tributaries thereof, wells, or into any subterranean or other waters used or intended to be used for human or animal consumption or for domestic purposes.

Anything done, maintained, or suffered, in violation of any of the provisions of this section, shall be deemed to be a public nuisance, and may be summarily abated as such by any court of competent jurisdiction at the suit of the secretary of social and health services or any person whose supply of water for human or animal consumption or for domestic purposes is or may be affected.

[ 1979 c 141 s 40; 1965 c 7 s 35.88.080. Prior: (i) 1941 c 186 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-1. (ii) 1941 c 186 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-3.]

NOTES:

Nuisance: Chapter 9.66 RCW.